fr: Matériau des touches: ABS; Aluminum; ABS double injection; PBT sublimé; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polycarbonate (PC); Autre
el: Υλικό καπακιού πλήκτρου: ABS; Αλουμίνιο; Διπλής έκχυσης ABS; PBT με εξάχνωση βαφής; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Πολυανθρακικό πολυμερές (PC); Άλλο
cs: Materiál kláves: ABS; Hliník; Dvouvrstvý ABS; Sublimovaný PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polykarbonát (PC); Jiné
pl: Materiał nasadek na klawisze: ABS; Aluminium; ABS double-shot; PBT barwione sublimacyjnie; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Poliwęglan (PC); Inne
sv: Material för tangenter: ABS; Aluminium; Dubbelskotts-ABS; Färgsublimerad PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polykarbonat (PC); Övrigt
zh-CN: 键帽材料: ABS; 铝; 双色注塑 ABS; 热升华 PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; 聚碳酸酯 (PC); 其他
fi: Näppäinhatun materiaali: ABS; Alumiini; Kaksoisvalettu ABS; Värisublimoitu PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polykarbonaatti (PC); Muu
nb: Tastehettemateriale: ABS; Aluminium; Dobbeltskutt ABS; Fargesublimert PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polykarbonat (PC); Annet
es: Material de las teclas: ABS; Aluminio; ABS de doble inyección; PBT sublimado; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Policarbonato (PC); Otros
pt-PT: Material das teclas: ABS; Alumínio; ABS dupla injeção; PBT com sublimação; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Policarbonato (PC); Outro
th: วัสดุคีย์แคป: ABS; อะลูมิเนียม; ABS แบบดับเบิลช็อต; PBT แบบดายซับลิเมต; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; โพลิคาร์บอเนต (PC); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal kapice tipke: ABS; Aluminij; Dvostruki ABS; PBT s sublimiranom bojom; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polikarbonat (PC); Ostalo
tr: Tuş başlığı malzemesi: ABS; Alüminyum; Çift enjeksiyonlu ABS; Boya süblimasyon PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polikarbonat (PC); Diğer
it: Materiale del copritasto: ABS; Alluminio; ABS double-shot; PBT sublimato; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Policarbonato (PC); Altro
ko: 키캡 재료: ABS; 알루미늄; 더블샷 ABS; 염료 승화 PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; 폴리카보네이트(PC); 기타
nl: Materiaal toetsenkappen: ABS; Aluminium; Dubbele spuitgieting ABS; Kleursublimatie PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polycarbonaat (PC); Andere
sl-SI: Material kapic tipk: ABS; Aluminij; Dvostrelni ABS; Sublimacijski PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polikarbonat (PC); Drugo
da: Tastehættemateriale: ABS; Aluminum; Double-shot ABS; Farvesublimeret PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polycarbonat (PC); Andet
vi: Vật liệu nắp phím: ABS; Nhôm; ABS double-shot; PBT nhuộm thăng hoa; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polycarbonate (PC); Khác
zh-TW: 鍵帽材料: ABS; 鋁; 雙射 ABS; 熱昇華 PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; 聚碳酸酯 (PC); 其他
lt-LT: Klavišų dangtelių medžiaga: ABS; Aliuminis; Dvigubo liejimo ABS; Dažais sublimuotas PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polikarbonatas (PC); Kita
pt-BR: Material das teclas: ABS; Alumínio; ABS dupla injeção; PBT sublimado; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Policarbonato (PC); Outro
ja: キーキャップ材料: ABS; アルミニウム; ダブルショットABS; 昇華印刷PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; ポリカーボネート (PC); その他
de: Tastenkappenmaterial: ABS; Aluminium; Double-Shot ABS; Farbsublimiertes PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polycarbonat (PC); Sonstiges
ru: Материал колпачков клавиш: ABS; Алюминий; Двойной впрыск ABS; Сублимационная печать PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Поликарбонат (ПК); Другой
sk-SK: Materiál klávesov: ABS; Hliník; Dvojitý výstrek ABS; Farbivo sublimovaný PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polykarbonát (PC); Iné
ro-RO: Material capac de tastă: ABS; Aluminiu; ABS dublu injectat; PBT sublimat; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Policarbonat (PC); Altele
bg-BG: Материал на капачките на клавиатурата: ABS; Алуминий; Двоен лят ABS; PBT със сублимационно багрене; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Поликарбонат (PC); Други
hu: Billentyűsapka anyaga: ABS; Alumínium; Kétlövetű ABS; Szublimációs PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polikarbonát (PC); Egyéb
en: Keycap material: ABS; Aluminum; Double-shot ABS; Dye-sublimated PBT; PBT; POM; PPS; PVC; Polycarbonate (PC); Other